Mississippi, session 2026, HB1941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c) "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund created in Section 49-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2030. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund created pursuant to Section 49-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund created in Section 49-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed as provided in such section under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 2.  Section 49-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-39-7.  (1)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated the "Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund."  The special fund shall consist of monies appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner.  Monies shall be accounted for in such a manner to be termed unobligated funds or obligated funds.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund; however, any unobligated monies in excess of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00), excluding federal funds, remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year that have not been appropriated shall lapse into the State General Fund.  Monies in the special fund may be used upon selection by the board.  The board and the Department of Finance and Administration may use not more than * * *two percent (2%) three percent (3%) of monies in the special fund to defray the board's expenses in carrying out its duties under this chapter. (b)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter, monies in the special fund may be used and expended by the board to provide funds for grants to counties, municipalities, state agencies and nongovernmental entities for: (i)  Improvement of state park outdoor recreation features and trails; (ii)  Acquisition and improvement of parks and trails by counties and municipalities, if such parks and trails lie within the jurisdiction of such counties and municipalities; (iii)  Restoration or enhancement projects to create or improve access to public waters and lands for public outdoor recreation, conservation education, or the safe use and enjoyment of permanently protected conservation land; (iv)  Restoration or enhancement on privately owned working agricultural lands and forests that support conservation of soil, water, habitat of fish and wildlife resources; (v)  Restoration or enhancement of wetlands, native forests, native grasslands and other unique habitats important for Mississippi's fish and wildlife; and (vi)  Acquisition of critical areas for the provision or protection of clean water, wildlife, hunting, fishing, military installation buffering or natural resource-based outdoor recreation.  Real property may only be acquired under this subparagraph (vi) when the property: 1.  Is, at the time of acquisition, being leased by the state as a wildlife management area; 2.  Adjoins or is in close proximity to state or federal wildlife management areas or state parks, or would provide better public access to such areas; 3. Is identified in a wildlife action plan developed by a state agency; 4. Constitutes riparian lands, and its acquisition is for the purpose of protecting any drinking water supply; or 5.  Surrounds a military base or military installation. Acquisition of land under this subparagraph (vi) may not be made through the exercise of any power of eminent domain or any condemnation proceeding. (c)  Unless otherwise authorized by the board, a county, municipality, state agency or nongovernmental entity receiving funds for a project under this section must expend the funds for the project within two (2) years after receipt of the funds in order to be eligible to apply for additional funds for the project under this section.  If a county, municipality, state agency or nongovernmental entity receiving funds for a project does not expend the funds within two (2) years after receipt of the funds, then the county, municipality, state agency or nongovernmental entity must provide an accounting of such unused funds and the reason for failure to expend the funds.  If the board determines that the project will not be completed in a timely manner, the county, municipality, state agency or nongovernmental entity must then return any unexpended funds. (d)  Monies in the special fund may not be used, expended or transferred for any other purpose other than authorized in this chapter. (e)  Any state agency receiving funds from the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund under this section may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. (2)  (a)  The board shall accept applications from counties, municipalities, state agencies and nongovernmental entities for project proposals eligible for funding under this section.  The board shall evaluate the proposals received in accordance with this chapter. (b)  A county, municipality, state agency or nongovernmental entity desiring assistance under this section must submit a complete application to the board.  The application must include a description of the purpose for which assistance is requested, the type and amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the board. (c)  The board shall require annual independent audits of all expenditures from the special fund and present those findings to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, Chairs of the Senate Finance and House Ways and Means Committees and Chairs of the Senate and House Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees. (d)  To be eligible for funding, any nongovernmental entity applicant must submit its most recent audit, disclose any audit deficiencies in the previous five (5) years, submit its certificate of good standing from the Mississippi Secretary of State, and submit a current list of its board members for purposes of conflicts of interest. (e) For funds to be spent on private land, the applicant must show demonstrably that the project will benefit the public. (f)  Projects that acquire property shall not be considered for approval until after July 1, 2024. (3)  The board, at its first meeting of each calendar year, shall prepare a list of priorities and criteria to guide the selection of projects.  The board shall give increased priority to projects: (a)  Supporting the public recreation and conservation efforts of state agencies, counties and municipalities; (b)  Leveraging or matching other nonfederal or federal funds available for similar purposes; (c)  Supporting and promoting recreation in the form of archery, boating, hiking, camping, fishing, hunting, running, jogging, biking, walking, shooting or similar outdoor activities; (d)  Contributing to the improvement of the quality and quantity of surface water and groundwater; or (e)  Contributing to the conservation of soil, water, and fish and wildlife resources on privately owned working agricultural lands or forests. (4)  Upon approval of the total list of projects by the board, the list of projects shall be submitted to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, Chairs of the Senate Finance and House Ways and Means Committees and Chairs of the Senate and House Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees.  If federal funds or guidelines become available and are certified by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Executive Director of the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Fund, the board shall be authorized to expend funds from the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund and shall notify the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, Chairs of the Senate Finance and House Ways and Means Committees, Chairs of the Senate and House Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees, and Legislative Budget Office of such expenditures prior to their distribution to certain projects approved by the board. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.